Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1144.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 7701 and 7702(a) and (c) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 7701. Blind veteran's pension.(a) [Definition.--As used in this section the term "blind veteran" shall mean any person who served in the military or naval forces of the United States, or any woman's organization officially connected therewith, at any time, and who gave the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, as his or her place of residence at the time of entering the military or naval forces of the United States, and who while performing duties connected with 12345678910111213141516 such service suffered an injury or incurred a disease which resulted in blindness to the extent that he or she has 3/60 or 10/200 or less normal vision. The term "blind veteran" shall not include any person separated from the military or naval forces of the United States, or any woman's organization officially connected therewith, under other than honorable conditions.] Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Blind veteran." A veteran who is a current permanent resident of this Commonwealth or who gave this Commonwealth as the veteran's place of residence at the time of entering the armed forces of the United States, including a reserve component or the National Guard, and who, while performing duties connected with such service, suffered an injury or incurred a disease which resulted in blindness to the extent that the veteran has 3/60 or 10/200 or less normal vision."Discharge papers or separation documents." As defined in section 7101.2 (relating to definitions)."Statement of service." As defined in section 7101.2."Veteran." An individual who served, as evidenced by the veteran's discharge papers or separation documents or statement of service, in the armed forces of the United States, including a reserve component or the National Guard, after a period of active duty, other than active duty for training, whose last discharge or release was under conditions other than dishonorable as specified under section 104 (relating to character of discharge)."VETERAN." AN INDIVIDUAL WHO SERVED IN THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES, INCLUDING A RESERVE COMPONENT OR THE NATIONAL 20250HB1144PN1659 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 GUARD, WHOSE LAST DISCHARGE OR RELEASE WAS UNDER CONDITIONS OTHER THAN DISHONORABLE AS SPECIFIED UNDER SECTION 104 (RELATING TO CHARACTER OF DISCHARGE).(b) Amount and eligibility.--In addition to any other assistance provided by the Commonwealth and in addition to any compensation provided by the Federal Government, every blind veteran shall be paid a pension of [$150] $200 per month. Applications for such pensions shall be made to and in the form prescribed by the department. The Adjutant General shall have the power, and it shall be his duty to determine the eligibility of every applicant for a pension, and his decision in the matter shall be final.(c) Regulations.--The Adjutant General shall promulgate such regulations as may be necessary to implement this program.§ 7702. Amputee and paralyzed veteran's pension.(a) Amount and eligibility.--In addition to any other assistance provided by the Commonwealth and in addition to any compensation provided by the Federal Government, every amputee and paralyzed veteran shall be paid a pension of [$150] $200 per month. Applications for the pensions shall be made to and in the form prescribed by the department. The Adjutant General shall determine the eligibility of every applicant for a pension, and his decision in the matter shall be final.* * *(c) [Definition.--As used in this section the term "amputee and paralyzed veteran" means any person who served in the military or naval forces of the United States, or any woman's organization officially connected therewith, and who gave this Commonwealth as his or her place of residence at the time of entering the military or naval forces of the United States and 20250HB1144PN1659 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 who, while performing duties connected with such service, suffered an injury or incurred a disease which resulted in the loss or the permanent and severe or complete paralysis of two or more limbs, being defined as having at least two limbs with a 40% disability compensation rating or higher in each limb as determined and certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs in accordance with 38 CFR Ch. 1 Pt. 4 (relating to schedule for rating disabilities), or its successor. The term does not include any person separated from the military or naval forces of the United States under other than honorable conditions.] Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Amputee and paralyzed veteran." A veteran who is a current permanent resident of this Commonwealth or who gave this Commonwealth as the veteran's place of residence at the time of entering the armed forces of the United States, including a reserve component or the National Guard, and who, while performing duties connected with such service, suffered an injury or incurred a disease which resulted in the loss or the permanent and severe or complete paralysis of two or more limbs, being defined as having at least two limbs with a 40% disability compensation rating or higher in each limb as determined and certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs in accordance with 38 CFR Ch. 1 Pt. 4 (relating to schedule for rating disabilities)."Veteran." As defined in section 7701 (relating to blind veteran's pension). AN INDIVIDUAL WHO SERVED IN THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES, INCLUDING A RESERVE COMPONENT OR THE 20250HB1144PN1659 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NATIONAL GUARD, WHOSE LAST DISCHARGE OR RELEASE WAS UNDER CONDITIONS OTHER THAN DISHONORABLE AS SPECIFIED UNDER SECTION 104 (RELATING TO CHARACTER OF DISCHARGE).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1144PN1659 - 5 - 1234